test/src/morphology/N-kuulj38_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuulʼ: # Noun (38) kuulʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Nom: kuulʼ
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Gen: kooli
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Par: kuuli
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Ill: kuuli
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Gen: kuulõ
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Par: kuulõ
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [kuulõhe, kuulõ]
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+All: koolõlõ
